Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 16 Food and Beverages

11-16-1.
Sale of unwholesome meat or drink.

Except as otherwise provided, in respect to specific articles of meat or drink, every person who shall sell any kind of diseased, corrupted, or unwholesome provisions, whether for meat or drink, shall be imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months or be fined not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 282, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 348, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 400, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 611, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-16-1

.

11-16-2.
Sale or killing of young calves.

Every person who shall kill or cause to be killed, for the purpose of sale, or who shall sell to any person engaged in the business of killing of animals to be used for food purposes, any calf less than four (4) weeks old and the weight of which is less than seventy-five (75) pounds, or shall sell, or possess with intent to sell, the flesh of any calf which he or she knows to have been killed when less than four (4) weeks old, or the weight of which calf before being killed he or she knows to have been less than seventy-five (75) pounds, shall be fined not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 282, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 348, § 2; P.L. 1914, ch. 1055, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 400, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 611, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-16-2

.

11-16-3.
Wrapping of food in second-hand paper.

No dealer in groceries, meats, provisions, or any articles of food whatsoever shall use or cause to be used newspapers, printed paper or other second-hand paper for the purpose of wrapping up such articles of food, unless the food shall first be placed in paper carton boxes, jars, tins, or other sanitary receptacles. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 348, § 4; P.L. 1911, ch. 708, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 400, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 611, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-16-3

.

11-16-4.
Furnishing wood alcohol for beverage purposes.

Every person who sells, furnishes, or gives away wood alcohol or any preparation or compound containing wood alcohol, knowing that it is to be used for beverage purposes, shall be punished by imprisonment for life or any term of years, and he or she shall be liable to an action for damages for injuries to the person of anyone using the wood alcohol or the preparation or compound for beverage purposes, or if death results from that use, to an action for damages for the death of the person under the provisions of §§

10-7-1

—

10-7-4

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 34; P.L. 1932, ch. 1857, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

11-16-4

.

11-16-5.
Poisoning with intent to kill.

Every person who shall mingle any poison with any food, drink, or medicine, with intent to kill or injure any person, and every person who shall willfully poison any spring, well or reservoir of water with that intent, shall be imprisoned for life or for any term of years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

11-16-5

.

11-16-6.
Poisoning in general.

Every person who shall knowingly offer, give or entice any other person to take or accept any treat, candy, gift, or food for consumption which is poisonous shall be subject to imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than twenty (20) years and may be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 154, § 1.

11-16-7.
Tampering with packaging.

Every person who tampers with the contents of a package or container for sale to the public with the intent to injure a potential user of the contents shall be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than three (3) years nor more than ten (10) years, or a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 193, § 1.